Hawaii statutes.
§576D-14 Implementation of income
withholding. (a) For cases being enforced under the Title IV-D state plan
or for those parents applying to the agency for services, the income of an
obligor who receives income on a periodic basis and who has a support
obligation imposed by a support order issued or modified in the State before
January 1, 1994, and issued or modified thereafter, if not otherwise subject to
withholding, shall become subject to withholding as provided in subsection (b)
if arrearages or delinquency occur, without the need for a judicial or
administrative hearing. The income of an obligor shall become subject to
withholding without regard to whether there are arrearages or delinquency upon
the agency receiving a request for income withholding from the obligee and a
determination made by the agency that income withholding is appropriate, or
upon the agency receiving a request for income withholding from the obligor.
The agency shall implement such withholding without the necessity of any application
in the case of a child with respect to whom services are already being provided
under Title IV-D and shall implement withholding on the basis of an application
for services under Title IV-D in the case of any other child on whose behalf a
support order has been issued or modified. In either case, the withholding
shall occur without the need for any amendment to the support order involved or
for any further action by the court or other entity that issued the order.

(b) If the obligor who receives income on a
periodic basis becomes delinquent in making payments under a support order in
an amount at least equal to the support payable for one month, the agency shall
issue an income withholding order that shall include an amount to be paid
towards the delinquency. The income withholding order shall be in the standard
format prescribed by Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, as amended by the
child support enforcement agency. The order shall be served upon the employer
by regular mail, by personal delivery, or by transmission to the employer
through electronic means.

(c) Upon the agency's receipt of an income
withholding request from any other state or agency administering a
program under Title IV-D, the agency may issue an income withholding order to
collect the support imposed upon the obligor by a support order issued or
modified by the other state. The order shall include an amount adequate to
ensure that past due payments and payments that will become due in the future
under the terms of the support order will be paid.

(d) A copy of the order shall be filed in the
office of the clerk of the circuit court in the circuit where the order was
issued.

(e) Upon sending the order of income
withholding to the employer, the agency shall send a notice of the withholding
by regular mail to each obligor to whom subsections (b) and (c) apply. The
notice shall inform the obligor:

(1) That the withholding has commenced;

(2) That the obligor may request a hearing in writing
within fourteen days of the date of the notice;

(3) That, unless the obligor files a written request
for a hearing within fourteen days of the date of the notice, the money
received from the income withholding will be distributed to the custodial
parent or, in an interstate case, the obligee in the other jurisdiction, or in
the case where the children are receiving public assistance, to the State;

(4) That the only defense to income withholding is a
mistake of fact; and

(5) Of the information that was provided to the
employer with respect to the employer's duties pursuant to section 576E-16.

(f) The agency may delay the distribution of
collections toward arrearages or delinquency until the resolution of any
requested hearing regarding the arrearages or delinquency.

(g) Upon timely receipt of a request for a
hearing from the obligor pursuant to the notice provided under subsection (e),
the agency shall refer the matter to the office and a hearing shall be
conducted pursuant to chapters 91 and 576E.

(h) Upon receiving an order of income
withholding from the agency, the employer is subject to the requirements of
section 576E-16(b) through (h).

(i) In a case being enforced under the Title
IV-D state plan or for those parents applying to the agency for services, the
agency may enforce the existing order of support by sending to the employer by
regular mail, by personal delivery, or by transmission through electronic
means, a notice to withhold child support issued by the agency that reflects
the terms and conditions specified in the order for support or income
withholding order. Upon receiving a notice to withhold child support, the
employer is subject to the requirements of section 576E-16(b) to (h).

(j) The agency may terminate income
withholding by sending a notice to the employer by regular mail, by personal
delivery, or by transmission through electronic means. The notice shall be
issued upon determination by the agency that the obligor no longer owes the
child support or that the obligation is being satisfied through withholding by
another employer.

(k) The agency may adopt rules in accordance
with chapter 91 as may be necessary to implement and administer income
withholding under this section and sections 571-52, 571-52.2, 571-52.3, and
576E-16. [L 1997, c 293, pt of §6; am L 1998, c 83, §§5, 6; am L 2000, c 194,
§5; am L 2001, c 95, §3; am L 2002, c 84, §3; am L 2005, c 26, §3; am L 2006, c
34, §2; am L 2011, c 79, §5]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next